Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB22.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.786 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Academic term" means the fall or spring academic semester;
(b) "Academic year" means July 1 through June 30 of each year;
(c) "Approved dual credit course" means a dual credit course developed in
accordance with KRS 164.098 and shall include:
1. General education courses that meet the criteria outlined in the statewide
general education core approved by the Council on Postsecondary
Education; and
2. Career and technical education courses within a career pathway
approved by the Kentucky Department of Education that leads to an
industry-recognized credential;
(d) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(e) "Dual credit" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.007;
(f) "Dual credit tuition rate ceiling" means one-third (1/3) of the per credit hour
tuition amount, rounded down to the nearest whole dollar, charged by the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System for in-state students;
(g) "Eligible high school apprentice" means an eligible high school student
that is enrolled in an eligible registered teacher apprenticeship program;
(h) "Eligible high school student" means a student who:
1. Is a Kentucky resident;
2. Is enrolled in a Kentucky high school;
3. Has completed a thirty (30) minute college success counseling session;
and
4. Is enrolled, or accepted for enrollment, in an approved dual credit course
Page 1 of 6
BR039300.100 - 393 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 393
at a participating institution;
(i) "Eligible registered teacher apprenticeship program" means a registered
teacher apprenticeship program that is:
1. Offered by a school district, in partnership with one (1) or more
postsecondary institutions;
2. Designed to prepare future educators by providing student participants
a direct pathway towards teacher certification and employment within
the school district; and
3. Approved by the Education and Labor Cabinet in accordance with
KRS Chapter 343 and the authority for the purposes of this section;
(j)[(h)] "Participating institution" means a postsecondary institution that:
1. Has an agreement with the authority for the administration of the Dual
Credit Scholarship Program;
2. Charges no more than the dual credit tuition rate ceiling per credit hour,
including any additional fees, for any approved dual credit course it
offers to any Kentucky public or nonpublic high school student;
3. Does not charge any tuition or fees to an eligible high school student for
an approved dual credit course beyond what is paid by the Dual Credit
Scholarship Program when the course is not successfully completed; and
4. Is a:
a. Kentucky Community and Technical College System institution;
b. Four (4) year Kentucky public college or university; or
c. Four (4) year private college or university that is accredited by the
Southern Association of Colleges and Schools and whose main
campus is located in Kentucky; and
(k)[(i)] "Successfully completed" means a student receiving both
secondary and postsecondary credit upon completion of an approved dual
Page 2 of 6
BR039300.100 - 393 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 393
credit course.
(2) To promote dual credit coursework opportunities at no cost to eligible Kentucky
high school students, the General Assembly hereby establishes the Dual Credit
Scholarship Program.
(3) In consultation with the Council on Postsecondary Education and the Kentucky
Department of Education, the authority shall administer the Dual Credit Scholarship
Program and shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A as may be needed for the administration of the program.
(4) (a) Each high school shall apply to the authority for dual credit scholarship funds
for each eligible high school student.
(b) The authority may award a dual credit scholarship to an eligible high school
student for an academic term on a first-come, first-served basis by application
date, to the extent funds are available for that purpose.
(c) An eligible high school student may receive a dual credit scholarship for a
maximum of:
1. a. Two (2) career and technical education dual credit courses per
academic year; and
b.[2.] Two (2) general education dual credit courses over the junior and
senior year; or
2. Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, an eligible high school
apprentice may receive a total of twenty (20) dual credit courses,
which shall not exceed eight (8) courses per academic year, that are
required for admission to a teacher education program in pursuit of
initial teacher certification.
(d) The dual credit scholarship award amount shall be equal to the amount
charged by a participating institution, not to exceed the dual credit tuition rate
ceiling for each dual credit hour.
Page 3 of 6
BR039300.100 - 393 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 393
(e) Dual credit scholarship funds shall not be used for remedial or developmental
coursework.
(5) (a) To qualify for the dual credit scholarship for an eligible registered teacher
apprenticeship program, a student shall:
1. Be approved by a school district to participate as an eligible high
school apprentice in an eligible registered teacher apprenticeship
program;
2. Submit a program commitment form, as required by the authority, that
is signed by the student, parent or guardian of a minor student, and
superintendent or designee;
3. Successfully complete a minimum of one (1) teaching and learning
career pathway course each year of high school while participating in
the eligible registered teacher apprenticeship program until
completion of all required pathway courses; and
4. Achieve a grade of C or higher on all courses paid for by the dual
credit scholarship as an eligible high school apprentice.
(b) An eligible high school apprentice who withdraws from the program or does
not achieve the academic criteria for continued eligibility while in high
school:
1. Shall not be eligible for additional dual credit courses through the
eligible registered teacher apprenticeship program;
2. May receive additional dual credit scholarships under subsection
(4)(c)1. of this section, except course eligibility shall be reduced by the
courses taken under subsection (4)(c)2. of this section; and
3. Shall be required to repay the authority the dual credit scholarship
amount paid for courses that exceed the number of courses provided
under subsection (4)(c)1. of this section unless waived by the authority
Page 4 of 6
BR039300.100 - 393 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 393
for cause. Any person who fails to repay this obligation to the
authority shall not be awarded a grant or scholarship under any
program administered by the authority under KRS Chapter 164 until
all financial obligations to the authority are satisfied, except that
ineligibility for this reason may be waived by the authority for cause.
(c) To be considered for approval by the authority as offering an eligible
registered teacher apprenticeship program under this section, the school
district shall:
1. Design the program to offer full-time teaching positions within the
home school district to students who complete an eligible registered
teacher apprenticeship program and obtain Kentucky teacher
certification whenever a vacancy permits;
2. Establish partnerships with postsecondary institutions for providing
dual credit coursework and matriculation into teacher education
programs upon high school graduation to participating students;
3. Ensure that dual credit courses taken by students participating in the
program will be transferable for purposes of completing the teacher
education program at the partner postsecondary institution upon high
school graduation; and
4. Execute an agreement with the authority for participation as an
eligible registered teacher apprenticeship program under the terms
and conditions required by the authority.
(6) Each participating institution shall submit information each academic term to the
authority required for the administration of the scholarship as determined by the
authority.
(7)[(6)] The authority shall provide an annual report to the secretary of the Education
and Labor Cabinet, the president of the Council on Postsecondary Education and
Page 5 of 6
BR039300.100 - 393 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 393
the commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Education to include:
(a) The number of students, by local school district and in total, served by the
Dual Credit Scholarship Program; and
(b) The number of general education and career and technical education dual
credits earned by students by high school and in total.
(8)[(7)] By May 31 of each year, the Kentucky Center for Statistics, in collaboration
with the authority, shall publish data on the Dual Credit Scholarship Program's
academic and workforce outcomes. The center shall annually provide a report on
the data to the Interim Joint Committee on Education.
(9)[(8)] (a) The Dual Credit Scholarship Program trust fund is hereby created as a
trust fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority for the purpose of providing scholarships
described in this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and
grants from public and private sources, and federal funds.
(c) Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested
as provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Page 6 of 6
BR039300.100 - 393 - XXXX 1/22/2026 2:42 PM Jacketed